Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290A.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Homeowners; homestead credit refund. A claimant whose property taxes payable are in excess of the percentage of the household income stated below shall pay an amount equal to the percent of income shown for the appropriate household income level along with the percent to be paid by the claimant of the remaining amount of property taxes payable. The state refund equals the amount of property taxes payable that remain, up to the state refund amount shown below. Household Income Percent of Income Percent Paid byClaimant Maximum StateRefund $0 to deleted text begin 2,079deleted text end new text begin 2,239new text end 1.0 percent deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin sixnew text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 2,080 to 4,139 deleted text end new text begin 2,240 to 4,459 new text end 1.1 percent 12new text begin sixnew text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 4,140 to 6,269 deleted text end new text begin 4,460 to 6,749 new text end 1.2 percent deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin sixnew text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 6,270 to 8,369 deleted text end new text begin 6,750 to 9,009 new text end 1.3 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 8,370 to 10,439 deleted text end new text begin 9,010 to 11,239 new text end 1.4 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 10,440 to 14,619 deleted text end new text begin 11,240 to 15,739 new text end 1.5 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 14,620 to 16,689 deleted text end new text begin 15,740 to 17,959 new text end 1.6 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 16,690 to 18,799 deleted text end new text begin 17,960 to 20,229 new text end 1.7 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 18,800 to 20,879 deleted text end new text begin 20,230 to 22,469 new text end 1.8 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 20,880 to 22,949 deleted text end new text begin 22,470 to 24,699 new text end 1.9 percent deleted text begin 22deleted text end new text begin 11new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 22,950 to 29,239 deleted text end new text begin 24,700 to 31,469 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 22deleted text end new text begin 16new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 29,240 to 31,319 deleted text end new text begin 31,470 to 33,709 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 27deleted text end new text begin 21new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 31,320 to 35,509 deleted text end new text begin 33,710 to 38,219 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 27deleted text end new text begin 21new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 35,510 to 50,099 deleted text end new text begin 38,220 to 53,919 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 32deleted text end new text begin 26new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,560 new text end deleted text begin 50,100 to 73,059 deleted text end new text begin 53,920 to 78,629 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 32deleted text end new text begin 26new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,680 deleted text end new text begin 2,880 new text end deleted text begin 73,060 to 83,499 deleted text end new text begin 78,630 to 89,869 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 31new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,350 deleted text end new text begin 2,530 new text end deleted text begin 83,500 to 93,939 deleted text end new text begin 89,870 to 101,109 new text end 2.1 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 31new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,940 deleted text end new text begin 2,090 new text end deleted text begin 93,940 to 104,379 deleted text end new text begin 101,110 to 112,339 new text end 2.2 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 31new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,740 deleted text end new text begin 1,870 new text end deleted text begin 104,380 to 114,819 deleted text end new text begin 112,340 to 123,579 new text end 2.3 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 31new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,520 deleted text end new text begin 1,640 new text end deleted text begin 114,820 to 121,089 deleted text end new text begin 123,580 to 130,329 new text end 2.4 percent deleted text begin 42deleted text end new text begin 36new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,280 deleted text end new text begin 1,380 new text end deleted text begin 121,090 to 125,289 deleted text end new text begin 130,330 to 134,849 new text end 2.5 percent deleted text begin 42deleted text end new text begin 36new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,070 deleted text end new text begin 1,150 new text end deleted text begin 125,290 to 130,349 deleted text end new text begin 134,850 to 140,289 new text end 2.5 percent deleted text begin 47deleted text end new text begin 41new text end percent $ deleted text begin 870 deleted text end new text begin 940 new text end deleted text begin 130,350 to 135,409 deleted text end new text begin 140,290 to 145,739 new text end 2.5 percent 47new text begin 41new text end percent $ deleted text begin 650 deleted text end new text begin 700 new text end The payment made to a claimant shall be the amount of the state refund calculated under this subdivision. No payment is allowed if the claimant's household income is deleted text begin $135,410deleted text end new text begin $145,740new text end or more. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for claims based on property taxes payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290A.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Inflation adjustment. The commissioner shall annually adjust the dollar amounts of the income thresholds and the maximum refunds under subdivision 2 as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for claims based on property taxes payable in 2027. new text end